Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PUBLIC TELEVISION STATIONS.new text end new text begin $1,925,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for grants to public television stations for operations. Of this amount, $350,000 is for a grant to Pioneer PBS; $475,000 is for a grant to Lakeland PBS; $650,000 is for a grant to KSMQ; $250,000 is for a grant to PBS North; and $200,000 is for a grant to Prairie Public television. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end